District of Columbia statutes.
2-359.05

District government not liable for punitive damages.

In an action in contract based upon a written contract executed on behalf of the District government, or by an official or employee acting within the scope of the official’s or the employee’s authority, the District government, and its officers, departments, agencies, or other units of government, shall not be liable for punitive damages.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 905, 58 DCR 1185
2001 Ed., § 2-308.02.